Wisconsin, session 2025, AB365.
do enact as follows:AB365,11Section 1. 59.69 (16) of the statutes is created to read:AB365,2,7259.69 (16) Accessory dwelling units. (a) In this subsection, “accessory 3dwelling unit” means a residential dwelling unit that is located on the same parcel 4as an existing single-family or multi-family dwelling and that provides complete 5independent living facilities for one or more persons. An accessory dwelling unit 6may be within, attached to, or detached from an existing or planned single-family or 7multi-family dwelling.AB365,2,128(b) Notwithstanding sub. (4) and subject to par. (c), an ordinance under this 9section shall allow as a use permitted by right at least one accessory dwelling unit 10on each parcel on which single-family or multi-family residential use is a use 11permitted by right. In this paragraph, “use permitted by right” does not include a 12use that is subject to a conditional use permit.AB365,2,1613(c) For accessory dwelling units located on the same parcel as another single-14family dwelling, an ordinance under this section may limit the size of an accessory 15dwelling unit to not larger than 75 percent of the existing square footage of the 16existing single-family dwelling on the same parcel.AB365,2,1817(d) Except as provided in par. (c), an ordinance under this section may not do 18any of the following:AB365,3,211. Charge fees, other than standard building permit fees, related to the 2addition of an accessory dwelling unit to a parcel.AB365,3,432. Provide dimensional, physical, design, or locational requirements that 4apply to accessory dwelling units, but do not apply to single-family dwellings.AB365,3,653. Provide standards, other than standards relating to habitability, that apply 6to accessory dwelling units but do not apply to other accessory structures.AB365,3,874. Impose any additional parking requirements to parcels on the basis of the 8existence of an accessory dwelling unit.AB365,3,1095. Require the installation of a separate utility connection to an accessory 10dwelling unit.AB365,211Section 2. 60.61 (3o) of the statutes is created to read:AB365,3,171260.61 (3o) Accessory dwelling units. (a) In this subsection, “accessory 13dwelling unit” means a residential dwelling unit that is located on the same parcel 14as an existing single-family or multi-family dwelling and that provides complete 15independent living facilities for one or more persons. An accessory dwelling unit 16may be within, attached to, or detached from an existing or planned single-family or 17multi-family dwelling.AB365,3,2218(b) Notwithstanding sub. (2) and subject to par. (c), a town with a zoning 19ordinance under this section shall allow as a use permitted by right at least one 20accessory dwelling unit on each parcel on which single-family or multi-family 21residential use is a use permitted by right. In this paragraph, “use permitted by 22right” does not include a use that is subject to a conditional use permit.AB365,4,223(c) For accessory dwelling units located on the same parcel as another single-24family dwelling, a town with a zoning ordinance under this section may limit the 1size of an accessory dwelling unit to not larger than 75 percent of the existing 2square footage of the existing single-family dwelling on the same parcel.AB365,4,43(d) Except as provided in par. (c), a town with a zoning ordinance under this 4section may not do any of the following:AB365,4,651. Charge fees, other than standard building permit fees, related to the 6addition of an accessory dwelling unit to a parcel.AB365,4,872. Provide dimensional, physical, design, or locational requirements that 8apply to accessory dwelling units, but do not apply to single-family dwellings.AB365,4,1093. Provide standards, other than standards relating to habitability, that apply 10to accessory dwelling units but do not apply to other accessory structures.AB365,4,12114. Impose any additional parking requirements to parcels on the basis of the 12existence of an accessory dwelling unit.AB365,4,14135. Require the installation of a separate utility connection to an accessory 14dwelling unit.AB365,315Section 3. 62.23 (7) (j) of the statutes is created to read:AB365,4,211662.23 (7) (j) Accessory dwelling units. 1. In this paragraph, “accessory 17dwelling unit” means a residential dwelling unit that is located on the same parcel 18as an existing single-family or multi-family dwelling and that provides complete 19independent living facilities for one or more persons. An accessory dwelling unit 20may be within, attached to, or detached from an existing or planned single-family or 21multi-family dwelling.AB365,5,2222. Notwithstanding par. (b) and subject to subd. 3., a city that has a zoning 23ordinance under this subsection shall allow as a use permitted by right at least one 24accessory dwelling unit on each parcel on which single-family or multi-family 1residential use is a use permitted by right. In this subdivision, “use permitted by 2right” does not include a use that is subject to a conditional use permit.AB365,5,633. For accessory dwelling units located on the same parcel as another single-4family dwelling, a city may limit the size of an accessory dwelling unit to not larger 5than 75 percent of the existing square footage of the existing single-family dwelling 6on the same parcel.AB365,5,774. Except as provided in subd. 3., a city may not do any of the following:AB365,5,98a. Charge fees, other than standard building permit fees, related to the 9addition of an accessory dwelling unit to a parcel.AB365,5,1110b. Provide dimensional, physical, design, or locational requirements that 11apply to accessory dwelling units, but do not apply to single-family dwellings.AB365,5,1312c. Provide standards, other than standards relating to habitability, that apply 13to accessory dwelling units but do not apply to other accessory structures.AB365,5,1514d. Impose any additional parking requirements to parcels on the basis of the 15existence of an accessory dwelling unit.AB365,5,1716e. Require the installation of a separate utility connection to an accessory 17dwelling unit.AB365,418Section 4. 710.18 (8) of the statutes is created to read:AB365,5,2419710.18 (8) Limitations on association regulations; accessory dwelling 20units. (a) Except as provided in par. (b), the association for a residential planned 21community may not adopt or enforce covenants and restrictions or any other rule or 22regulation, and may not enter into an agreement, that restricts or prevents the 23construction, maintenance, or use of an accessory dwelling unit allowed under s. 2459.69 (16), 60.61 (3o), or 62.23 (7) (j).AB365,6,41(b) The association for a residential planned community may adopt and 2enforce covenants and restrictions or any other rule or regulation, or may enter into 3an agreement, related to accessory dwelling units that is necessary to protect public 4health and safety.AB365,55Section 5. 710.26 of the statutes is created to read:AB365,6,106710.26 Prohibiting accessory dwelling units prohibited. Any covenant, 7restriction, or condition contained in a deed or other instrument affecting real 8property that prohibits or unreasonably restricts the construction, maintenance, or 9use of an accessory dwelling unit allowed under s. 59.69 (16), 60.61 (3o), or 62.23 (7) 10(j) is void and unenforceable.AB365,611Section 6. Nonstatutory provisions.AB365,6,1512(1) Legislative intent statement. The legislature finds that any private 13law device such as a covenant, restriction, or condition contained in a deed or other 14instrument that has the effect of prohibiting the construction of an accessory 15dwelling unit on a single-family parcel is contrary to public policy.AB365,716Section 7. Initial applicability. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab365 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab365 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB365 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB365 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB365: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting